Hawaii statutes.
[§431:19-208] Issuance of securities.
(a) A special purpose financial captive insurance company may issue
securities, as defined in section 485A-102, subject to and in accordance with
its approved plan of operation and its organizational documents.

(b) A special purpose financial captive
insurance company, in connection with the issuance of securities, may enter
into and perform all of its obligations under any required contracts to
facilitate the issuance of these securities.

(c) A special purpose financial captive
insurance company may:

(1) Subject to the approval of the commissioner,
account for the proceeds of surplus notes as surplus; and

(2) Submit for prior approval of the commissioner,
periodic written requests for payments of interest on and repayment of
principal surplus notes, and any other debt obligations issued by the special
purpose financial captive insurance company; provided that the commissioner
may, in lieu of the approval of periodic written requests, approve a formula or
plan that provides for the payment of interest, principal, or both.

(d) Securities issued by a special purpose
financial captive insurance company pursuant to an insurance securitization
shall not be considered to be insurance or reinsurance contracts. An investor
in these securities or a holder of these securities, by sole means of this
investment or holding, shall not be considered to be transacting the business
of insurance in this State. The underwriter's placement or selling agents and
their partners, directors, officers, members, managers, employees, agents,
representatives, and advisors involved in an insurance securitization pursuant
to this part shall not be considered to be insurance producers or brokers or
conducting business as an insurance or reinsurance company or agency,
brokerage, intermediary, advisory, or consulting business only by virtue of
their activities in conjunction with the insurance securitization. [L 2008, c
190, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next